District of Columbia statutes.
38-919

Community input and demographic analysis in annual capital request.

The District of Columbia Public Schools shall submit annually with its capital request a report that details how the capital request reflects the required community input and demographic analysis.

Mar. 20, 1998, D.C. Law 12-60, § 1302, 44 DCR 7378
For temporary addition of section, see § 1302 of the Fiscal Year 1998 Revised Budget Support Emergency Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-152, October 17, 1997, 44 DCR 6196), and § 1302 of the Fiscal Year 1998 Revised Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-239, January 13, 1998, 45 DCR 508).
Section 2002 of D.C. Law 12-59 provided that the act shall apply as of October 1, 1997.
Section 2001(b) of D.C. Law 12-59 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
Section 1302 of D.C. Law 12-59 added § 31-2219 [1981 Ed.].
1981 Ed., § 31-2219.